Arkansas, session 2025, HB1735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-271-107 is amended to read as follows:
14-271-107. Membership in One Call Center.
(a) All operators of underground facilities shall become members of
the One Call Center; however, the commission Arkansas Public Service
Commission may provide, by rule or by orders, for such exemptions or waivers
concerning some or all of the requirements of membership as may appear
reasonable and proper, as long as the exemption or waiver is not prohibited
by statute or federal law.
(b)(1) An operator of an underground facility that fails to become a
member of the One Call Center within thirty (30) days of a written warning is
subject to a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) unless the operator of an
underground facility receives an exemption or a waiver under subsection (a)
*ANS342*
04-07-2025 14:02:23 ANS342

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 HB1735
of this section.
(2) An additional fine of five hundred dollars ($500) may be
assessed for each thirty (30) calendar days the operator of the underground
facility fails to become a member of the One Call Center until the operator
of the underground facility applies to become a member of the One Call
Center.
(c) Additionally, other persons who own or control underground
facilities or similar facilities may, upon application, become members of the
One Call Center.
(c)(d) Membership shall be evidenced by participation in, and payment
for, the services furnished by the One Call Center.

/s/Eaves























04-07-2025 14:02:23 ANS342